Hawaii statutes.
[§481E-3] Athlete agents: registration
required; void contracts. (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection
(b), an individual may not act as an athlete agent in this State without
holding a certificate of registration under section 481E‑5 or 481E‑7.

(b) Before being issued a certificate of
registration, an individual may act as an athlete agent in this State for all
purposes except signing an agency contract, if:

(1) A student-athlete or another person acting on
behalf of the student-athlete initiates communication with the individual; and

(2) Within seven days after an initial act as an
athlete agent, the individual submits an application for registration as an
athlete agent in this State.

(c) An agency contract resulting from conduct
in violation of this section is void, and the athlete agent shall return any
consideration received under the contract. [L 2007, c 248, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next